Utah statutes.
53A-24-108.   Acceptance and use of gifts -- Not subject to appropriation.
(1)  The executive director may, with the approval of the board, accept and
use gifts made unconditionally by will or otherwise for carrying out the
purposes of this chapter.
(2)  Gifts made under conditions that the board finds to be consistent with
this chapter may be accepted and used in accordance with the conditions of the
gift.
(3)  Gifts are not subject to appropriation by the Legislature.
